test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-l1_gt-norm.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen:  ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph:  ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen:  ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph:  ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App:  lookup

Tests: 

  Adjective - beinur:  # 
    beinur+A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: beinur
    beinur+A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: beinan
    beinur+A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: beinum
    beinur+A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: beins
    beinur+A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: beinir
    beinur+A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: beinar
    beinur+A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: beinum
    beinur+A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: beina

    beinur+A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: bein
    beinur+A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: beina
    beinur+A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: beinar
    beinur+A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: beinar
    beinur+A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: beinar
    beinur+A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: beinum
    beinur+A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: beina

    beinur+A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: beint
    beinur+A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: beint
    beinur+A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: beinum
    beinur+A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: beins
    beinur+A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: bein
    beinur+A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: bein
    beinur+A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: beinum
    beinur+A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: beina

    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: beinari

    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: beinari

    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: beinari

    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: beinastur
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: beinastan
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: beinastum
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: beinasts
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: beinastir
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: beinastar
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: beinastum
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: [beinasta, beinastra]

    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: beinast
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: beinasta
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: beinastari
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: [beinastar, beinastrar]
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: beinastar
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: beinastar
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: beinastum
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: [beinasta, beinastra]

    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: beinast
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: beinast
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: beinastum
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: beinasts
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: beinast
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: beinast
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: beinastum
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: [beinasta, beinastra]

    beinur+A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: beini
    beinur+A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: beina
    beinur+A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: beina
    beinur+A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: beina
    beinur+A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: beinu
    beinur+A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: beinu
    beinur+A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: beinu
    beinur+A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: beinu

    beinur+A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: beina
    beinur+A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: beinu
    beinur+A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: beinu
    beinur+A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: beinu
    beinur+A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: beinu
    beinur+A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: beinu
    beinur+A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: beinu
    beinur+A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: beinu

    beinur+A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: beina
    beinur+A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: beina
    beinur+A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: beina
    beinur+A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: beina
    beinur+A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: beinu
    beinur+A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: beinu
    beinur+A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: beinu
    beinur+A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: beinu

    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: beinari
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: beinara
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: beinara
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: beinara
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: beinaru
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: beinaru
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: beinaru
    beinur+A+Comp+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: beinaru

    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: beinara
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: beinaru
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: beinaru
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: beinaru
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: beinaru
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: beinaru
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: beinaru
    beinur+A+Comp+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: beinaru

    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: beinara
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: beinara
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: beinara
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: beinara
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: beinaru
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: beinaru
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: beinaru
    beinur+A+Comp+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: beinaru

    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: beinasti
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: beinasta
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: beinasta
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: beinasta
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: beinastu
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: beinastu
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: beinastu
    beinur+A+Superl+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: beinastu

    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: beinasta
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: beinastu
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: beinastu
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: beinastu
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: beinastu
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: beinastu
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: beinastu
    beinur+A+Superl+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: beinastu

    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: beinasta
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: beinasta
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: beinasta
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: beinasta
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: beinastu
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: beinastu
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: beinastu
    beinur+A+Superl+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: beinastu
